Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2510.01
Residence, defined.

Residence shall mean that place at which a person has established his or her home, where he or she is habitually present, and to which, when he or she departs, he or she intends to return.

Laws 1984, LB 1010, § 4.